District of Columbia statutes.
8-1312

Severability.

Each separate provision of this chapter shall be deemed independent of any other provision of this chapter, and if any provision, sentence, clause, section, or part thereof is held illegal, invalid, or unconstitutional or inapplicable to any person or circumstance, such illegality, invalidity, unconstitutionality, or inapplicability shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions, sentences, clauses, sections, or parts of this chapter or their application to other parts or circumstances. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter would have been enacted if such illegal, invalid, or unconstitutional provision, sentence, clause, section, or part had not been included therein, and if the person or circumstances to which this chapter or any part thereof is inapplicable had been specifically exempted therefrom.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 13, 24 DCR 6289

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-712.
1973 Ed., § 6-532.